Missouri, session 2026, SB1591.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 135, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 135.2100, to read as
follows:
135.2100. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms shall mean:
(1) "Contribution", a donation of cash, stock, bonds,
or other marketable securities, or real property;
(2) "Director", the director of the department of
mental health;
(3) "Prevention resource center", a not-for-profit
entity with a mission to reduce the illegal or age-
inappropriate use or misuse of alcohol, tobacco, and other
drugs;
(4) "State tax liability", in the case of a business
taxpayer, any liability incurred by such taxpayer pursuant
to the provisions of chapters 143, 147, 148, and 153,
excluding sections 143.191 to 143.265 and related
provisions, and in the case of an individual taxpayer, any
liability incurred by such taxpayer pursuant to the

SB 1591 2
provisions of chapter 143, excluding sections 143.191 to
143.265 and related provisions;
(5) "Taxpayer", a person, firm, a partner in a firm,
corporation, or a shareholder in an S corporation doing
business in the state of Missouri and subject to the state
income tax imposed by the provisions of chapter 143, or a
corporation subject to the annual corporation franchise tax
imposed by the provisions of chapter 147, or an insurance
company paying an annual tax on its gross premium receipts
in this state, or other financial institution paying taxes
to the state of Missouri or any political subdivision of
this state pursuant to the provisions of chapter 148, or an
express company which pays an annual tax on its gross
receipts in this state pursuant to chapter 153, or an
individual subject to the state income tax imposed by the
provisions of chapter 143, or any charitable organization
which is exempt from federal income tax and whose Missouri
unrelated business taxable income, if any, would be subject
to the state income tax imposed under chapter 143.
2. (1) For all tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2027, a taxpayer shall be allowed to claim a tax
credit against the taxpayer's state tax liability in an
amount equal to seventy percent of the amount such taxpayer
contributed to a prevention resource center.
(2) The cumulative amount of the tax credits
authorized pursuant to this section shall not exceed two
million five hundred thousand dollars in any fiscal year.
3. The amount of the tax credit claimed shall not
exceed the amount of the taxpayer's state tax liability for
the tax year for which the credit is claimed, and such
taxpayer shall not be allowed to claim a tax credit in
excess of one hundred thousand dollars per tax year.

SB 1591 3
However, any tax credit that cannot be claimed in the tax
year the contribution was made may be carried over only to
the next succeeding tax year. No tax credit issued under
this section shall be assigned, transferred, or sold.
4. Except for any excess credit which is carried over
pursuant to subsection 3 of this section, a taxpayer shall
not be allowed to claim a tax credit unless the total amount
of such taxpayer's contribution or contributions to a
prevention resource center or centers in such taxpayer's tax
year has a value of at least one hundred dollars.
5. The director shall determine, at least annually,
which facilities in this state may be classified as
prevention resource centers. The director may require of a
facility seeking to be classified as a prevention resource
center whatever information which is reasonably necessary to
make such a determination. The director shall classify a
facility as a prevention resource center if such facility
meets the definition set forth in subsection 1 of this
section.
6. The director shall establish a procedure by which a
taxpayer can determine if a facility has been classified as
a prevention resource center. Prevention resource centers
shall be permitted to decline a contribution from a taxpayer.
7. Each prevention resource center shall provide
information to the director concerning the identity of each
taxpayer making a contribution to the prevention resource
center who is claiming a tax credit pursuant to this section
and the amount of the contribution. The director shall
provide the information to the director of revenue. The
director shall be subject to the confidentiality and penalty
provisions of section 32.057 relating to the disclosure of
tax information.

SB 1591 4
8. The provisions of section 23.253 shall not apply to
this section.
✓